rm-surmiran/dictionaries/rm-surmiran.aff
SET UTF-8
FLAG num

PFX T Y 103
PFX T 0 l' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX T a l'A a
PFX T e l'E e
PFX T i l'I i
PFX T o l'O o
PFX T u l'U u
PFX T h l'H h
PFX T 0 L' [AEIOUH]
PFX T a L'A a
PFX T e L'E e
PFX T i L'I i
PFX T o L'O o
PFX T u L'U u
PFX T h L'H h
PFX T 0 all' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX T a all'A a
PFX T e all'E e
PFX T i all'I i
PFX T o all'O o
PFX T u all'U u
PFX T h all'H h
PFX T 0 All' [AEIOUH]
PFX T a All'A a
PFX T e All'E e
PFX T i All'I i
PFX T o All'O o
PFX T u All'U u
PFX T h All'H h
PFX T 0 ALL' [AEIOUH][QWERTYUIOPLKJHGFDSAZXCVBNM]
PFX T 0 dall' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX T a dall'A a
PFX T e dall'E e
PFX T i dall'I i
PFX T o dall'O o
PFX T u dall'U u
PFX T h dall'H h
PFX T 0 Dall' [AEIOUH]
PFX T a Dall'A a
PFX T e Dall'E e
PFX T i Dall'I i
PFX T o Dall'O o
PFX T u Dall'U u
PFX T h Dall'H h
PFX T 0 DALL' [AEIOUH][QWERTYUIOPLKJHGFDSAZXCVBNM]
PFX T 0 d' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX T a d'A a
PFX T e d'E e
PFX T i d'I i
PFX T o d'O o
PFX T u d'U u
PFX T h d'H h
PFX T 0 D' [AEIOUH]
PFX T a D'A a
PFX T e D'E e
PFX T i D'I i
PFX T o D'O o
PFX T u D'U u
PFX T h D'H h
PFX T 0 chest' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX T a chest'A a
PFX T e chest'E e
PFX T i chest'I i
PFX T o chest'O o
PFX T u chest'U u
PFX T h chest'H h
PFX T 0 Chest' [AEIOUH]
PFX T a Chest'A a
PFX T e Chest'E e
PFX T i Chest'I i
PFX T o Chest'O o
PFX T u Chest'U u
PFX T h Chest'H h
PFX T 0 CHEST' [AEIOUH][QWERTYUIOPLKJHGFDSAZXCVBNM]
PFX T 0 chell' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX T a chell'A a
PFX T e chell'E e
PFX T i chell'I i
PFX T o chell'O o
PFX T u chell'U u
PFX T h chell'H h
PFX T 0 Chell' [AEIOUH]
PFX T a Chell'A a
PFX T e Chell'E e
PFX T i Chell'I i
PFX T o Chell'O o
PFX T u Chell'U u
PFX T h Chell'H h
PFX T 0 CHELL' [AEIOUH][QWERTYUIOPLKJHGFDSAZXCVBNM]
PFX T 0 mintg' [aeiouhAEIOUH]
PFX T a mintg'A a
PFX T e mintg'E e
PFX T i mintg'I i
PFX T o mintg'O o
PFX T u mintg'U u
PFX T h mintg'H h
PFX T 0 Mintg' [AEIOUH]
PFX T a Mintg'A a
PFX T e Mintg'E e
PFX T i Mintg'I i
PFX T o Mintg'O o
PFX T u Mintg'U u
PFX T h Mintg'H h
PFX T 0 MINTG' [AEIOUH][QWERTYUIOPLKJHGFDSAZXCVBNM]
